District of Columbia statutes.
47-4656

Abatement of real property taxes for Howard Town Center.

[Not funded.]

History

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-257, § 2(b), 60 DCR 992
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7018(b), 60 DCR 12472

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “October 1, 2015” and a closing period for “October 1, 2014; and” in (b)(1); and in (b)(2), substituted “$800,000” for “$1.1 million” and “$8 million” for “$11 million”.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7185, see § 2(u)(2) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-257, § 3, see § 7018(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-257, § 3, see § 7018(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 7018(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 7018(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 19-257, § 3a, concerning the law’s applicability, see § 7194 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 19-257, § 3a, concerning the law’s applicability, see § 7184 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 7185 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7185, concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 2(p) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 19-257, § 3a, concerning the law’s applicability, see § 7184 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of a provision concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 7185 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7185, concerning funding of the Emerging Business District Demonstration Projects grant program, see § 2(p) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-257 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7018(a) of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-257, § 3.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Section 7184 of D.C. Law 20-155 added D.C. Law 19-257,§ 3a, which provided that this act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.